Rhode Island, session 2025, SB15.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 27-8-11 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-8 entitled "Casualty
Insurance Generally" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-8-11. Regulations on cancellation and renewal.
(a) In addition to, and not in lieu of, any other power the commissioner has to issue rules
and regulations, the commissioner of insurance may promulgate, in accordance with the procedure
established in chapter 35 of title 42, reasonable rules and regulations concerning cancellation and
renewal of liability and property damage insurance for automobiles rated as private passenger
automobiles, homeowners insurance, residential fire insurance, or any components thereof. Those
regulations may require that the insurer shall furnish to the named insured the reason, or reasons,
for cancellation or nonrenewal. Those regulations shall also require that the insurer furnish, at least
thirty (30) days prior to renewal, written notice of any coverage reductions, elimination, or
increased deductibles not made at the request of the insured. The notice shall itemize and describe
the policy coverage reductions, elimination, or increased deductibles and shall be captioned
“NOTICE OF REDUCTION IN COVERAGE”. The policyholder shall be notified that the policy
renewal contains the “NOTICE OF REDUCTION IN COVERAGE” by one of the following
manners:
(1) By mailing the “NOTICE OF REDUCTION IN COVERAGE” separate from the
renewal policy package mailing; or

(2) By printing “NOTICE OF REDUCTION IN COVERAGE ENCLOSED” on the
renewal policy package envelope and including said reductions in the first few pages of the renewal
policy package; or
(3) By printing “NOTICE OF REDUCTION IN COVERAGE ENCLOSED” on the first
page of the renewal policy package; or
(4) If the renewal policy package is made available by email, the email notifying the
policyholder of the renewal shall contain a statement that the policy contains a “NOTICE OF
REDUCTION IN COVERAGE” and said reductions shall be in the first few pages of the renewal
policy package.
These coverage changes must be approved by the insurance division with respect to those
types of insurance defined in § 27-8-1(1) — (8), issued to non-business insured and bodily injury
and property damage liability coverage issued to non-business insured. There shall be no liability
on the part of, and no cause of action of any nature shall arise against, the commissioner of
insurance or any insurer, their authorized representatives, agents, or employees, or any firm, person,
or corporation furnishing to the insurer or commissioner information as to the reasons for
cancellation or nonrenewal; for any statement made by any of them in any written notice of
cancellation or nonrenewal; or in any other communication, oral or written, specifying the reasons
for cancellation or nonrenewal; or for the providing of information pertaining to the cancellation
or nonrenewal; or for statements made, or evidence submitted, at any hearing conducted in
connection with the cancellation or nonrenewal.
(b) The commissioner shall promulgate regulations with respect to personal motor vehicle
insurance, homeowners insurance, and residential fire insurance, or any components of that
insurance requiring notification to policyholders upon renewal of any coverage reductions,
elimination, or increased deductibles not at the request of the insured.
(c) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, on and after September 1, 2025, any increase
of more than twenty percent (20%) in the cost of renewal of homeowner’s insurance shall require
two (2) months’ advance notice be provided by the insurer to the policyholder. If an insurer is
failing to renew a homeowner’s policy, the notice of non-renewal shall be delivered to the
policyholder no less than two (2) months in advance of the policy expiration.
(d) On and after September 1 2025, annual home owner policy renewal premium increases
shall be capped at a maximum of five (5%) percent for any policyholder who is sixty-five (65)
years of age or older and has household income equal to or less than the Rhode Island income limits
for low- and moderate-income households as published by RI Housing.
(e) Any violation of the provisions of this section shall constitute a deceptive trade practice
LC000431 - Page 2 of 4

in violation of chapter 13.1 of title 6, and each violation shall be punishable by a fine not to exceed
one thousand dollars ($1,000).
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000431
========
LC000431 - Page 3 of 4